Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-503
Act, how cited.

Sections 46-501 to 46-573 may be known and cited as Reclamation Act, the districts created hereunder may be termed reclamation districts; and the bonds which may be issued hereunder may be called reclamation district bonds, which designation may be engraved or printed on their face.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 2(1), p. 524.

This and the eleven succeeding sections contain definition of terms used in Reclamation Act. Nebraska Mid-State Reclamation District v. Hall County, 152 Neb. 410, 41 N.W.2d 397 (1950).